test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_1_tuorestai_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tuorestai - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'torsdag' n_1 - ei tsekattu
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Nom: tuorestai
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Gen: tuorestain
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Par: tuorestaita
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Tra: tuorestaiksi
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Abe: tuorestaitta
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Ine: tuorestaissa
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Ela: tuorestaista
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Ill: tuorestaihin
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Ade: tuorestaila
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Abl: tuorestailta
     tuorestai+N+Sg+All: tuorestaile
     tuorestai+N+Sg+Ess: tuorestaina
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Nom: tuorestait
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Gen: tuorestaitten
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Par: tuorestaita
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Tra: tuorestaiksi
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Abe: tuorestaitta
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Ine: tuorestaissa
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Ela: tuorestaista
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Ill: tuorestaihin
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Ade: tuorestaila
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Abl: tuorestailta
     tuorestai+N+Pl+All: tuorestaile
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Ess: tuorestaina
     tuorestai+N+Pl+Com: tuorestaine
